North Dakota statutes. TITLE 7 Building and Loan Associations [Repealed]
CHAPTER 7-02 Powers and Duties [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6, effective August 1, 2009]

Note.

Section 6 of ch. 78, S.L. 2007 provides for the repeal of Title 7 effective August 1, 2009.

7-02-01.
General powers. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-02-02.
Power to issue shares — Share accounts — Dividends. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-02-03.
Power to make assessments and collections. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-02-04.
Interest, dues, assessments limited — Usury. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-02-05.
Membership fees limited. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-02-06.
Excessive collections and charges — Penalty. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-02-07.
Powers regarding withdrawal, cancellation, and retirement of shares — Free shares — Pledged shares. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-02-08.
General power to borrow, loan, invest, and deposit funds. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-02-08.1.
Issuance of certificates of deposit — Penalty. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-02-09.
Investments in certain railroad obligations authorized. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-02-10.
Power to make limited investments in certain securities. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-02-11.
Insurance of shares in federal corporation. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-02-11.1.
Operation without deposit insurance prohibited — Liability — Penalty. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-02-12.
Authority for land development for residential purposes. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-02-13.
Savings and loan association investment in service corporation. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-02-14.
Powers granted federally chartered savings associations extended to state-chartered associations. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-02-15.
Annual escrow account statement. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]